Washington statutes.
RCW 19.310.110

Deposit of client funds—Written notice.

(1) An exchange facilitator must deposit all client funds in a separately identified account, as defined in treasury regulation section 1.468B-6(c)(ii), for the particular client or client's matter, and the client must receive all the earnings credited to the separately identified account.

(2) An exchange facilitator must provide the client with written notification of how the exchange proceeds have been invested or deposited.

[ 2013 c 228 s 6; 2009 c 70 s 12.]